Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2852.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-37.3 of the General Laws entitled "Confidentiality of Healthcare
Communications and Information Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-37.3-13. Electronic transmission of medical notes and records.
(a) A healthcare provider shall, upon the written request of a patient or the patient’s
authorized representative, furnish medical notes or other medical records in any readily producible
form or format consistent with state and federal law.
(b) Permissible formats shall include, but not be limited to, paper copies, facsimile
transmission, secure electronic transmission, patient portal access, and electronic mail.
(c) A provider may transmit a medical note or medical record by electronic mail, including
unencrypted email, when:
(1) The patient provides a written authorization identifying the specific email address for
delivery;
(2) The authorization acknowledges the potential privacy and security risks of email
transmission; and
(3) The patient consents to receive the information by email despite such risks.
(d) The provider shall retain the patient’s authorization in the medical record.
(e) A provider shall not be required to transmit records by email if unable to do so in a
manner consistent with applicable federal law; provided an alternative lawful method is offered.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit rights under HIPAA or to require
encryption where a patient has expressly requested unencrypted email and acknowledged the risks.
(g) The department of health shall promulgate rules, regulations, or guidance, including
model authorization forms, to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005316
========
LC005316 - Page 2 of 3